Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Chapter 16

Controlled-Access Facilities

54-16-101. “Controlled-access facility” defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, “controlled-access facility” means a highway or street specially designed for through traffic, and over, from or to which owners or occupants of abutting land or other persons have no right or easement of access from abutting properties.

The highways or streets may be parkways, from which trucks, buses, and other commercial vehicles shall be excluded; or they may be freeways open to use by all customary forms of street and highway traffic.

Acts 1955, ch. 147, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-2001.

Cross-References. Injuries to controlled-access highways, misdemeanor, § 39-17-108.

Comparative Legislation. Controlled-access facilities:

Ala. Code § 23-3-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 27-68-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 40-6-50 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 177.220 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-5-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 300.355.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-89.48 et seq.

Va. Code § 33.1-57 et seq.

54-16-102. Authorization — State and local powers granted.

The highway authorities of the state, counties, cities, and towns, acting alone or in cooperation with each other or with any federal, state, or local agency, or any other state having authority to participate in the construction and maintenance of highways, are authorized to plan, designate, establish, regulate, vacate, alter, improve, maintain, and provide controlled-access facilities for public use wherever the authority or authorities are of the opinion that traffic conditions, present or future, justify the special facilities; provided, that within cities and towns the authority shall be subject to municipal consent as may be provided by law.

The highway authorities of the state, counties, cities, or towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter, also have and may exercise, relative to controlled-access facilities, any and all additional authority now or hereafter vested in them relative to highways or streets within their respective jurisdictions.

The authorities may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of the controlled-access facilities by the various classes of vehicles or traffic in a manner consistent with § 54-16-101.

Acts 1955, ch. 147, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-2002.

54-16-103. Construction and design — Control of traffic.

The highway authorities of the state, counties, cities, and towns are authorized to design any controlled-access facility and to regulate, restrict, or prohibit access to best serve the traffic for which the facility is intended, and their determination of the design shall be final. In this connection, the highway authorities are authorized to divide and separate any controlled-access facility into separate roadways by the construction of raised curbings, central dividing sections, or other physical separations, or by designating the separate roadways by signs, markers, stripes, and other devices.

No person shall have any right of ingress or egress to, from or across controlled-access facilities to or from abutting lands, except at designated points at which access may be permitted, upon terms and conditions that may be specified from time to time.

Acts 1955, ch. 147, § 3; T.C.A., § 54-2003.

Law Reviews.

Real Property — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Thomas G. Roady, Jr.), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1387.

54-16-104. Acquisition of property — Title acquired.

For the purpose of this chapter, the highway authorities of the state, counties, cities, and towns may acquire private or public property and property rights for controlled-access facilities and service roads, including rights of access, air, view, and light, by gift, devise, purchase, or condemnation in the same manner as the authorities are now or hereafter may be authorized by law to acquire the property or property rights in connection with highways and streets within their respective jurisdictions.

All property rights acquired under this chapter shall be in fee simple.

In connection with the acquisition of property or property rights for any controlled-access facility or portion of the facility, or service road in connection with the facility, the state, county, city, or town highway authority may, in its discretion, acquire an entire lot, block, or tract of land, if by so doing the interests of the public will be best served, even though the entire lot, block, or tract is not immediately needed for the right-of-way proper.

Acts 1955, ch. 147, § 4; T.C.A., § 54-2004.

Cross-References. Eminent domain for road purposes, title 29, ch. 17, part 8.

State powers of eminent domain relating to rights-of-way and road improvement, §§ 54-22-101, 54-22-104.

Law Reviews.

The Effect of the Public Use Requirement on Excess Condemnation, 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 370.

54-16-105. Grade separation — Access connections.

The highway authority may designate and establish controlled-access highways as new and additional facilities or may designate and establish an existing street or highway as included within a controlled-access facility.

The state or any of its subdivisions have the authority to provide for the elimination of intersections at grade of controlled-access facilities with existing state and county roads, and city or town streets, by grade separation of service road, or by closing off the roads and streets at the right-of-way boundary line of the controlled-access facility.

After the establishment of any controlled-access facility, no highway or street that is not part of the facility shall intersect the facility at grade.

No city or town street, county or state highway, or other public way shall be opened into or connected with the controlled-access facility without the consent and previous approval of the highway authority in the state, county, city or town having jurisdiction over the controlled-access facility. Consent and approval shall be given only if the public interest shall be served by the consent and approval.

Any abutting property owner claiming damages by virtue of the closing of any street or road on which the owner's property abuts shall have a right of action as provided by § 29-16-123.

Acts 1955, ch. 147, § 5; T.C.A., § 54-2005.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 28.

Cited: Maple Manor Hotel, Inc. v. Metropolitan Government of Nashville & Davidson County, 543 S.W.2d 593, 1975 Tenn. App. LEXIS 159 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1975).

54-16-106. Agreements between public agencies.

The highway authorities of the state, counties, cities, and towns are authorized to enter into agreements with each other, or with the federal government, respecting the financing, planning, establishment, improvement, maintenance, use, regulation, or vacation of controlled-access facilities or other public ways in their respective jurisdictions, to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1955, ch. 147, § 6; T.C.A., § 54-2006.

54-16-107. Control over local service roads.

In connection with the development of any controlled-access facility, the highway authorities of the state, county, city or town are authorized to plan, designate, establish, use, regulate, alter, improve, maintain, and vacate local service roads and streets or to designate as local service roads and streets any existing road or street, and to exercise jurisdiction over service roads in the same manner as is authorized over controlled-access facilities under the terms of this chapter, if in their opinion the local service roads and streets are necessary or desirable.

The local service roads or streets shall be of appropriate design, and shall be separated from the controlled-access facility proper by means of all devices designated as necessary or desirable by the proper authority.

Acts 1955, ch. 147, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-2007.

54-16-108. Rules of the road — Violations — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to:

Drive a vehicle over, upon, or across any curb, central dividing section, or other separation or dividing line on controlled-access facilities;

Make a left turn or a semicircular or U-turn except through an opening provided for that purpose in the dividing curb section, separation or line;

Drive any vehicle except in the proper lane provided for that purpose and in the proper direction and to the right of the central dividing curb, separation section or line; or

Drive any vehicle into the controlled-access facility from a local service road, except through an opening provided for that purpose in the dividing curb, dividing section or dividing line that separates the service road from the controlled-access facility proper.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1955, ch. 147, § 8; T.C.A., § 54-2008; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Rules of the road, title 55, ch. 8.

Cited: Hurd v. Flores, 221 S.W.3d 14, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 403 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 13, 2006); Shelby County v. Crews, 315 S.W.3d 477, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 783 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 23, 2009); State v. Schoenthal, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 294 (Tenn. Crim. App. Apr. 27, 2011).

54-16-109. Commercial enterprises and services on controlled-access facility prohibited — Exception — Establishment on private property abutting local service roads.

No commercial enterprise or activity for serving motor vehicle users, other than emergency services for disabled vehicles, shall be authorized or conducted by the commissioner of transportation, any other official or agency of the state, or any political subdivision of the state on property designated as, or acquired for, or in connection with, a controlled-access facility.

The highway authorities of the state, counties, cities and towns as authorized in § 54-16-107 may construct local service roads adjacent to a controlled-access facility in a manner that facilitates the establishment and operation of competitive commercial enterprises for serving motor vehicle users on private property abutting the service roads.

Acts 1957, ch. 247, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-2009; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-16-110. Interstate Route 440 designated parkway.

Interstate Route 440 in Davidson County is designated as a parkway.

Acts 1980, ch. 837, § 3.

54-16-111. Rest area mileage information signs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner of transportation is directed to include as a part of all signage at interstate rest areas in the state information that indicates the mileage to the next closest interstate rest area as a means of assistance to the tourists who travel our great state.

The erection of informational signs or the inclusion of mileage information on existing signs shall be within the guidelines prescribed by the Manual on Uniform Traffic Safety.

This section becomes operative only if the federal highway administrator advises the commissioner in writing that the provisions of this section do not render Tennessee in violation of federal laws and regulations and subject to penalties prescribed in the laws and regulations.

Acts 1993, ch. 146, §§ 1-3.

54-16-112. Underground fiber optic cable facilities — Intelligent transportation system and radio communications facilities — Rules and regulations — Setting rate of compensation — Creation of advisory board — Construction and application of section — Restrictions on use of underground fiber optic cable lines and related facilities.

The department of transportation may issue non-exclusive permits, on a competitively neutral and non-discriminatory basis, allowing the longitudinal installation of underground fiber optic cable lines and related facilities within the rights-of-way of controlled-access highways on the state highway system or federal interstate highway system, or both, subject to reasonable and appropriate regulations to protect the public safety and welfare.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, as a prerequisite to the issuance of a permit under subsection (a), the department has the authority to require a one-time payment of fair and reasonable compensation for use of the right-of-way. This compensation shall be in addition to any administrative fees or charges the department may require for the issuance of a permit. The department shall receive this compensation as determined by the advisory board in accordance with subsection (d). Any compensation received is to be used by the department solely for constructing, operating and maintaining an intelligent transportation system and radio communications facilities for use by the state.

As used in this section, “intelligent transportation system” means communications, computer and information systems and other technology utilized by the department to manage the flow of traffic on the controlled-access highways on the state highway system or federal interstate highway system, or both.

The commissioner of transportation has the authority to promulgate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out this section, except for the setting of the rate of compensation. The rate of compensation shall be set by the advisory board established pursuant to subsection (d).

There is created an advisory board to establish fair, reasonable and non-discriminatory compensation for the use of the right-of-way under this section. In determining the rate and method of the compensation, the board shall provide for the option, to be exercised at the discretion of the department, of payment of the compensation by the providing of telecommunications facilities and services, and for a method of valuation of such in-kind payments.

The advisory board shall consist of the governor or the governor's designee, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury, the state treasurer, the secretary of state, the commissioner of transportation, and three (3) representatives of the telecommunications industry.

The governor shall appoint one (1) telecommunications industry representative representing a facilities-based competing telecommunications services provider doing business in the state or a franchised cable company doing business in the state; the speaker of the senate shall appoint one (1) telecommunications industry representative representing an incumbent local exchange carrier doing business in the state; and the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one (1) telecommunication industry representative representing an inter-exchange carrier doing business in the state.

To ensure that competitive interests are represented on the advisory board, the three (3) representatives of the telecommunications industry shall at no time be employed by or otherwise related to the same person or any affiliate of the person. In the event that a conflict arises under this subdivision (d)(1)(C) because of a merger, acquisition or other transaction between two (2) or more persons within the telecommunications industry, then the appointing authorities of one (1) or more of the affected representatives shall appoint different representatives to avoid the conflict. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(C), “affiliate” means a person who directly, or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, another person.

The chair of the state regulatory authority shall be a nonvoting member of the advisory board. A majority of voting members shall constitute a quorum at a board meeting. No vote may be taken unless a quorum is present. All decisions of the board shall be made by a majority vote of those members present and entitled to vote.

In establishing the rate of fair and reasonable compensation for use of the right-of-way under this section, the advisory board shall consider all factors evidencing the value of use of the right-of-way, including, but not limited to, savings on construction costs due to ease of installation in controlled-access highway rights-of-way, comparable rates charged for the access, amount of right-of-way available in certain locations and demand for certain locations. Information pertaining to these factors shall be presented to the advisory board by the department and any other interested parties.

The initial rate set shall be effective until the advisory board reconsiders the rate as provided in subdivision (4).

Upon the request of the department or an applicant for a permit pursuant to subsection (a), the advisory board shall meet to consider a request to adjust the rate of compensation. Upon a showing that the current rate no longer reflects the value of access to the right-of-way, the board shall adjust the rate accordingly; provided, that the rate shall not be adjusted more frequently than once every twelve (12) months.

The department shall provide, upon request, any administrative assistance as required by the advisory board.

Nothing in this section or in any other provision of state law shall be construed to require the department to accommodate or permit the longitudinal installation of any utilities other than underground fiber optic cable lines and related facilities as permitted under this section within the rights-of-way of controlled-access highways, except as the department provides in its rules and regulations for accommodating facilities within highway rights-of-way.

This section applies only to the installation of underground fiber optic cable lines and related facilities within the rights-of-way on controlled access highways on the state highway or federal interstate highway system. Nothing in this section shall be construed as otherwise altering, amending or affecting the statutory, regulatory, or common law rights conferred to any telecommunications company to use the rights-of-way of any highways, county roads, city streets, or public lands of the state, including, but not limited to, those rights conferred by §§ 65-21-101 and 65-21-201.

The use of compensation received under this section to offer or provide telecommunication services to the public for hire by the department or through any other governmental or business entity or business arrangement is expressly prohibited.

[Deleted by 2013 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment.]

Acts 2000, ch. 949, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, §§ 16, 30.

Code Commission Notes.

The former first sentence of subdivision (d)(3), concerning the requirement that the advisory board meet within sixty days of June 23, 2000, to hear information presented by the department and render a decision within one hundred twenty days of June 23, 2000, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2008.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted (h)-(j) which read: “(h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no underground fiber optic cable lines and related facilities located pursuant to this section shall be used in whole or in part to detect or monitor misdemeanor traffic violations or to issue citations for misdemeanor traffic violations. For the purposes of this subsection (h), “misdemeanor traffic violations” means those traffic offenses punishable as Class C misdemeanors.“(i) The department shall, on an annual basis, file a report with the clerk of each house of the general assembly detailing the amount of compensation received for use of the rights-of-way, whether the compensation is in the form of money or telecommunications facilities and services or some combination of money or facilities and services, and from whom the compensation was received. If the compensation is in the form of telecommunications facilities and services, the report shall detail the type of facilities and services.“(j)(1) The department shall report annually to both houses of the general assembly as to the total amount of departmental funds, from any source, expended on intelligent transportation system projects during the previous fiscal year.“(2) Any compensation received by the department pursuant to this section that is not invested in the intelligent transportation system within five (5) fiscal years of the fiscal year of its receipt shall be transferred to the general fund.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

54-16-113. Removal of vehicles, spilled cargo or other personal property.

The department of safety, department of transportation, or local law enforcement agency may immediately remove or cause to be removed any wrecked, abandoned, unattended, burned or partially dismantled vehicle, spilled cargo or other personal property from the roadway of a controlled-access highway if the vehicle, cargo or personal property is creating an obstruction or hazard to traffic because of its position in relation to the highway, as determined by authorized officers or employees of the department or agency.

Vehicles, cargo or personal property may be removed to any place within the immediate vicinity without any further action or obligation by the department of transportation, department of safety, local law enforcement agency or others acting at the direction of such department or agency; provided, however, that in the event of a motor vehicle accident that results in apparent serious personal injury or death, no removal shall occur until a law enforcement officer determines that adequate information has been obtained for preparation of an accident report.

When the property creating an obstruction or hazard to traffic is a motor carrier, as defined in § 65-15-102, the agency causing its removal shall make a reasonable effort to allow the owner of the vehicle to arrange for its removal and shall give due consideration to having the vehicle towed by a licensed towing service capable of safely moving the vehicle in question. The final decision on removal shall rest with the agency causing the removal.

The removal of vehicles away from the immediate vicinity by law enforcement agencies pursuant to this section shall be subject to the same procedures as set forth in title 55, chapter 16. If the department of transportation removes or orders the removal of a vehicle away from the immediate vicinity, the department shall notify the department of safety or the local law enforcement agency, and the department of transportation shall follow the same procedures as in title 55, chapter 16; provided, that the department of transportation may make arrangements with the department of safety or local law enforcement agency to act on behalf of the department of transportation in complying with title 55, chapter 16.

If the department of safety, department of transportation, or local law enforcement agency removes or orders the removal of spilled cargo or personal property away from the immediate vicinity, the department or agency shall make reasonable efforts to notify the owner, if known, and shall allow the owner at least forty-eight (48) hours to claim the cargo or personal property; however, the department or agency may immediately dispose or arrange for the disposal of any cargo, personal property or other debris that is damaged beyond use or repair.

Any liability of the department of safety or the department of transportation for damage to vehicles or cargo resulting from removal pursuant to this section shall be determined in accordance with title 9, chapter 8, part 3.

Any liability of local law enforcement agencies for damage to vehicles or cargo resulting from removal pursuant to this section shall be determined in accordance with the Tennessee Governmental Tort Liability Act, compiled in title 29, chapter 20, part 1.

The department of safety, department of transportation, or local law enforcement agency may require the owner and carrier, if any, of the vehicle, spilled cargo or other personal property removed or disposed of under the authority of this section to pay for any costs incurred in the removal and subsequent disposition of the vehicle, spilled cargo or other personal property.

Acts 2000, ch. 806, § 1.

Cross-References. Removal of vehicles from accident scene where no personal injury has occurred, § 55-10-117.